Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
Banquet facility licenses to volunteer fire departments and volunteer emergency medical services agencies, which shall authorize the licensee to permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by any person, and bona fide members and guests thereof, otherwise eligible for a banquet license. However, lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages shall not be purchased or sold by the licensee or sold or charged for in any way by the person permitted to use the premises. Such premises shall be a volunteer fire or volunteer emergency medical services agency station or both, regularly occupied as such and recognized by the governing body of the county, city, or town in which it is located. Under conditions as specified by Board regulation, such premises may be other than a volunteer fire or volunteer emergency medical services agency station, provided such other premises are occupied and under the control of the volunteer fire department or volunteer emergency medical services agency while the privileges of its license are being exercised.

Designated outdoor refreshment area licenses to a locality, business improvement district, or nonprofit organization, which shall authorize (i) the licensee to permit the consumption of alcoholic beverages within the area designated by the Board for the designated outdoor refreshment area and (ii) any permanent retail on-premises licensee that is located within the area designated by the Board for the designated outdoor refreshment area to sell alcoholic beverages within the permanent retail location for consumption in the area designated for the designated outdoor refreshment area, including sidewalks and the premises of businesses not licensed to sell alcoholic beverages at retail, upon approval of such businesses. In determining the designated area for the designated outdoor refreshment area, the Board shall consult with the locality. Designated outdoor refreshment area licensees shall be limited to 16 events per year, and the duration of any event shall not exceed three consecutive days. However, the Board may increase the frequency and duration of events after adoption of an ordinance by a locality requesting such increase in frequency and duration. Such ordinance shall include the size and scope of the area within which such events will be held, a public safety plan, and any other considerations deemed necessary by the Board. Such limitations on the number of events that may be held shall not apply during the effective dates of any rule, regulation, or order that is issued by the Governor or State Health Commissioner to meet a public health emergency and that effectively reduces allowable restaurant seating capacity; however, designated outdoor refreshment area licensees shall be subject to all other applicable provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations and shall provide notice to the Board regarding the days and times during which the privileges of the license will be exercised. Only alcoholic beverages purchased from permanent retail on-premises licensees located within the designated area may be consumed at the event, and such alcoholic beverages shall be contained in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers that clearly display the name or logo of the retail on-premises licensee from which the alcoholic beverage was purchased. Alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the designated outdoor refreshment area licensee. The designated outdoor refreshment area licensee shall post appropriate signage clearly demarcating for the public the boundaries of the event; however, no physical barriers shall be required for this purpose. The designated outdoor refreshment area licensee shall provide adequate security for the event to ensure compliance with the applicable provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations.

Annual mixed beverage banquet licenses to duly organized private nonprofit fraternal, patriotic, or charitable membership organizations that are exempt from state and federal taxation and in charge of banquets conducted exclusively for members and their guests, which shall authorize the licensee to serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board on the premises of the place designated in the license. Such license shall authorize the licensee to conduct no more than 12 banquets per calendar year. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to §

4.1-233.1

.

Equine sporting event licenses, which may be issued to organizations holding equestrian, hunt, and steeplechase events, which shall authorize the licensee to permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by patrons thereof during such event. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the licensee. The privileges of this license shall be (i) limited to the premises of the licensee, regularly occupied and utilized for equestrian, hunt, and steeplechase events, and (ii) exercised on no more than four calendar days per year.

Annual arts venue event licenses, to persons operating an arts venue, which shall authorize the licensee participating in a community art walk that is open to the public to serve lawfully acquired wine or beer on the premises of the licensee to adult patrons thereof during such events. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way, directly or indirectly, by the licensee, and the licensee shall not give more than two five-ounce glasses of wine or two 12-ounce glasses of beer to any one adult patron. The privileges of this license shall be (i) limited to the premises of the arts venue regularly occupied and used as such and (ii) exercised on no more than 12 calendar days per year.

The Board may grant a marketplace license to persons operating a business enterprise of which the primary function is not the sale of alcoholic beverages, which shall authorize the licensee to serve complimentary wine or beer to bona fide customers on the licensed premises subject to any limitations imposed by the Board; however, the licensee shall not give more than two five-ounce glasses of wine or two 12-ounce glasses of beer to any customer per day, nor shall it sell or otherwise charge a fee to such customer for the wine or beer served or consumed. In order to be eligible for and retain a marketplace license, the applicant’s business enterprise must (i) provide a single category of goods or services in a manner intended to create a personalized experience for the customer; (ii) employ staff with expertise in such goods or services; (iii) be ineligible for any other license granted by the Board; (iv) have an alcoholic beverage control manager on the licensed premises at all times alcohol is served; (v) ensure that all employees satisfy any training requirements imposed by the Board; and (vi) purchase all wine and beer to be served from a licensed wholesaler or the Authority and retain purchase records as prescribed by the Board. In determining whether to grant a marketplace license, the Board shall consider (a) the average amount of time customers spend at the business; (b) the business’s hours of operation; (c) the amount of time that the business has been in operation; and (d) any other requirements deemed necessary by the Board to protect the public health, safety, and welfare.

The Board may grant the following shipper, bottler, and related licenses:

Wine and beer shipper licenses, which shall carry the privileges and limitations set forth in §

4.1-209.1

.

Internet wine and beer retailer licenses, which shall authorize persons located within or outside the Commonwealth to sell and ship wine and beer, in accordance with §

4.1-209.1

and Board regulations, in closed containers to persons in the Commonwealth to whom wine and beer may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption. Such licensee shall not be required to comply with the monthly food sale requirement established by Board regulations.

Bottler licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to acquire and receive deliveries and shipments of beer in closed containers and to bottle, sell, and deliver or ship it, in accordance with Board regulations to (i) wholesale beer licensees for the purpose of resale, (ii) owners of boats registered under the laws of the United States sailing for ports of call of a foreign country or another state, and (iii) persons outside the Commonwealth for resale outside the Commonwealth.

Fulfillment warehouse licenses, which shall authorize associations as defined in §

13.1-313

with a place of business located in the Commonwealth to (i) receive deliveries and shipments of wine or beer owned by holders of wine and beer shipper’s licenses; (ii) store such wine or beer on behalf of the owner; and (iii) pick, pack, and ship such wine or beer as directed by the owner, all in accordance with Board regulations. No wholesale wine or wholesale beer licensee, whether licensed in the Commonwealth or not, or any person under common control of such licensee, shall acquire or hold any financial interest, direct or indirect, in the business for which any fulfillment warehouse license is issued.

Marketing portal licenses, which shall authorize agricultural cooperative associations organized under the provisions of the Agricultural Cooperative Association Act (§

13.1-312

et seq.), with a place of business located in the Commonwealth, in accordance with Board regulations, to solicit and receive orders for wine or beer through the use of the Internet from persons in the Commonwealth to whom wine or beer may be lawfully sold, on behalf of holders of wine and beer shipper’s licenses. Upon receipt of an order for wine or beer, the licensee shall forward it to a holder of a wine and beer shipper’s license for fulfillment. Marketing portal licensees may also accept payment on behalf of the shipper.

Third-party delivery licenses, which shall carry the privileges and limitations set forth in §

4.1-212.2

.

History.

2020, cc. 15, 16, 32, 34, 400, 1009, 1113, 1114, 1179; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 34; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 1822021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282; , 3902022, cc. 78, 79, 589, 590.

Section set out twice.

The section set out above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered
§

4.1-206.3

.

The section set out above is effective July 1, 2022. For the version of this section effective until July 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

4.1-206.3

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

4.1-210

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment to former §

4.1-210

by Acts
2020, c. 400 was incorporated in subdivision A 1 of this section by adding the (1) designation and adding clause (2) in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

Former §

4.1-210

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment to former §

4.1-210

by Acts
2020, c. 1009 was incorporated in this section by inserting the fifth paragraph in subdivision A 1.

Former §

4.1-210

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment to former §

4.1-210

by Acts
2020, cc. 15 and
32 were incorporated in this section by adding subdivision A 7 h and making related changes in subdivisions A 7 f and g.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022, deleted portions of former §

4.1-209

and relocated them to this section. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment by Acts
2020, c. 1179 to former §

4.1-209

has been given effect in this by section, by inserting “distillers” following “wineries, breweries,” in subdivision C 1.

Former §

4.1-210

was repealed by Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment to former §

4.1-206

by Acts
2020, cc. 16 and
34 were incorporated in subdivision D 2 c of this section by substituting “16 special events per year, and the duration of any special event shall not exceed three consecutive days” for “12 special events per year” in the third sentence.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 5, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That any person who (i) is licensed pursuant to subdivision A 9, 11, 12, 14, 18, or 19 of
§

4.1-206

of the Code of Virginia, as it was in effect prior to July 1, 2020, and (ii) wishes to maintain licensure after December 31, 2021, shall apply for a marketplace license on or before July 1, 2021.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in
§

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of
§

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts
2022, cc. 78 and
79, cl. 2 provides: ‘‘That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.’’

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and
282, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall convene a work group to study the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption. In conducting the study, the work group shall analyze the implementation of the provisions of this act that authorize the sale and delivery of mixed beverages and pre-mixed wine for off-premises consumption, determine whether such provisions should be implemented permanently, and identify any further statutory or regulatory modifications that should be made in the event that such provisions are made permanent. The Authority shall report its findings and recommendations to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall collect data regarding the compliance of third-party delivery licensees with the provisions of this act and report such data to the Chairmen of the House Committee on General Laws and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services by November 1, 2023.”

Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Authority) shall monitor the implementation of the provisions of this act to identify any difficulties of third-party delivery licensees in determining locations to which alcoholic beverages may be delivered and the adequacy of applicable training and education programs. The Board of Directors of the Authority shall promulgate regulations, if necessary, to address any issues identified during such monitoring process.”

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 34, effective October 28, 2020, added the fourth sentence in subdivision D 2 c.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 182, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subdivision D 1 a, added clause (iii) and made a stylistic change.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first sentence of the first and second paragraphs of subdivision A 1 and A 6, inserted “on premises” and “or off-premises consumption”; in clause (1) of the third paragraph of subdivision A 1, inserted “or off-premises”; in clause (A) of the fifth paragraph of subdivision A 1, deleted “for on-premises consumption” following “sell alcoholic beverages” and inserted “for off-premises consumption or for on-premises consumption.” For expiration date see Editor’s note.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 390 and 391, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision D 2 c, substituted “designated outdoor refreshment area” for “local special events” and “special event” throughout; deleted “special” preceding “events” and “event” in the third
and sixth sentences,
added the fourth and fifth sentences, and deleted “special” preceding “event” in the last two sentences.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 78 and 79 are identical, and added subdivision F 6.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and added the sixth paragraph of subdivision A 1; added subdivision A 15; and inserted “private” in the first sentence of subdivision D 1 a.